Utah statutes.
58-54-501.   Unlawful and unprofessional conduct.

(1)  "Unlawful conduct" includes:

(a)  using any of the following titles if not licensed as a radiology technologist under this chapter:

(i)  radiology practical technician;

(ii)  radiologic technologist;

(iii)  medical radiographer;

(iv)  radiation therapist; or

(v)  nuclear medicine technologist;

(b)  using the title "radiology practical technician" if not licensed as a radiology practical technician under this chapter; and

(c)  using the title "radiologist assistant" if not licensed as a radiologist assistant under this chapter.

(2)  "Unprofessional conduct" includes:

(a)  any act or omission by a person licensed under this chapter that is contrary to the instructions of the radiologist or radiology practitioner responsible for supervising the licensee and which does or reasonably could pose a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of a patient or any other person;

(b)  operating any radiology equipment that is known to be unsafe or not in compliance with all applicable state requirements regulating radiology equipment;

(c)  permitting any person to operate any radiology equipment who is not permitted to do so under provisions of law or who is incompetent to operate radiology equipment for any reason;

(d)  revealing to any unauthorized person any information considered confidential or privileged regarding any patient;

(e)  the use of any controlled substance as defined by the statutes of this state except to the extent the controlled substance is lawfully prescribed to the licensee and used in accordance with the instructions of the prescribing practitioner; and

(f)  willfully and intentionally or negligently making any false statement or entry on any patient record or upon any record used to facilitate payment for radiology services.

